Georgia statutes. 
(Ga. L. 1898, p. 93, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 627; Code 1933, § 23-801; Ga. L. 1947, p. 173, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 6.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Duty arises instantly upon occurrence of vacancy. Newton v. Stembridge, 212 Ga. 828, 96 S.E.2d 504 (1957).

Cited in Stembridge v. Newton, 213 Ga. 304, 99 S.E.2d 133 (1957).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Filling vacancy in public office. - Vacancy in the office of tax collector is filled by temporary appointment by the ordinary (now county governing authority) until a special election to fill the vacancy is held and such special election may be held on the same day as the general election. 1945-47 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 83.

Special Act controls. - If a county has a special Act which varies this section, the county must follow the procedure there set forth. 1974 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U74-22.

Special elections. - O.C.G.A. § 36-5-21 is by its very term not applicable if the local Act creating the governing authority for the county provides for the manner of succession to fill a vacancy. 1990 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U90-9.

When the local law creating the board of commissioners for Houston County, as amended, provides that, with regard to vacancies occurring more than one year prior to the expiration of the term of office, the vacancy "shall be filled by a special election called by the election superintendent of Houston County in the same manner as in the case to fill vacancies in other county offices . . .," the general law relating to the filling of a vacancy on the county commission is not applicable, and the special election to fill the vacancy in the office of county commissioner should be conducted pursuant to the general special election provisions of the Georgia Election Code, O.C.G.A. §§ 21-2-540 and 21-2-541, as is the case with vacancies in other county offices when there is no specific provision which applies. 1990 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U90-9.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 164 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 163 et seq.

36-5-22. County manager authorized.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of any county of this state or the General Assembly may create in and for those counties in which it deems necessary or advisable the office of county manager and may vest in such office powers, duties, and responsibilities of an administrative nature. The qualifications, method of selection, appointment, compensation, tenure, and such other related matters pertaining to the office of county manager shall be provided for by the governing authority of the county.

(b) Nothing in this Code section shall pertain to consolidated governments which include all the area within any county.

(c) This Code section shall not apply to any county having a population of more than 500,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census.

History

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 435, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2341, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - Ga. L. 1974, pp. 435-6 which was codified as O.C.G.A. § 36-5-22, does not conflict with Ga. Const. 1976, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. I) and is constitutional. Gray v. Dixon, 249 Ga. 159, 289 S.E.2d 237 (1982).

County governing authority powers. - Any attempt by the board of commissioners to confer "executive powers" on the office of county manager would be an "action affecting the . . . form . . . of the county governing authority" in violation of subsection (c)(2) of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. I. Gray v. Dixon, 249 Ga. 159, 289 S.E.2d 237 (1982).

Ordinance creating the office of county manager which tracked the language of O.C.G.A. § 36-5-22 and vested in that office certain administrative functions, and did not attempt to confer the executive powers reserved for the chair, was consistent with the county's home rule authority and did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. I. Krieger v. Walton County Bd. of Comm'rs, 271 Ga. 791, 524 S.E.2d 461 (1999).

Defendant county manager did not have final authority over decisions that resulted in termination of an employee from the county; such authority rests with the board of commissioners under Georgia's home rule provisions in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. I. Lightsey v. Miles, (S.D. Ga. July 26, 2005).

36-5-22.1. Powers and duties; delegation.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each county has original and exclusive jurisdiction over the following subject matters:

(1) The directing and controlling of all the property of the county, according to law, as the governing authority deems expedient;

(2) The levying of a general tax for general county purposes and a special tax for particular county purposes;

(3) The establishing, altering, or abolishing of all roads, bridges, and ferries in conformity to law;

(4) Reserved;

(5) The filling of all vacancies in county offices unless some other body or official is empowered by law to so fill such vacancy;

(6) The examining, settling, and allowing of all claims against the county;

(7) The examining and auditing of the accounts of all officers having the care, management, keeping, collection, or disbursement of money belonging to the county or appropriated for its use and benefit and the settling of the same;

(8) The making of such rules and regulations for the support of the poor of the county, for the county police and patrol, for the promotion of health, and for quarantine as are authorized by law or not inconsistent therewith; and

(9) The regulating of peddling and fixing of the cost of licenses therefor.

(b) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit a local law from delegating to a chairman or chief executive officer of a county governing authority jurisdiction over any subject matter provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-22.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1051, § 1, Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 8.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Ga. L. 1987, p. 1051, § 1 and Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 8 enacted similar Code sections designated as Code Section 36-5-22.1. The Code section is set forth above as enacted by the latter Act (Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 8).

Cross references. - Application for and issuance of writ of mandamus against county board of commissioners to compel building, repair of county roads, § 9-6-21.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under former Code 1890, § 337, Ga. L. 1903, p. 41, former Civil Code 1910, and former O.C.G.A. §§ 36-5-1 and 36-5-2 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Act of ordinary (now county governing authority) exercised in matters specified by statute are quasi-judicial functions; and therefore the ordinarys are not liable to suit, even for gross errors of judgment committed in making such contracts. Paulding County v. Scoggins, 97 Ga. 253, 23 S.E. 845 (1895) (decided under former law).

Mandamus will not lie to compel ordinary (now county governing authority) to have bridge built, which was recommended by grand jury. Patterson v. Taylor, 98 Ga. 646, 25 S.E. 771 (1896) (decided under former Code 1890, § 337).

Discretion of ordinary (now county governing authority) as to rebuilding bridges not subject to control unless abused. Dale v. Barnett, 105 Ga. 259, 31 S.E. 167 (1898) (decided under former law).

Mandamus will not lie to collaterally attack order to alter public road. Crum v. Hargrove, 119 Ga. 471, 46 S.E. 626 (1904) (decided under Ga. L. 1903, p. 41).

Transfer of powers. - O.C.G.A. § 36-5-22.1 did not prevent the county board from passing resolutions which effectively transferred much of the power of the county chairperson to the county board. Krieger v. Walton County Bd. of Comm'rs, 269 Ga. 678, 506 S.E.2d 366 (1998).

Ordinary (now county governing authority) keeps power in face of charter provision. - Manner of removing obstructions by proceedings before ordinary (now county governing authority) is not divested by municipal charter provisions permitting mayor and council to exercise this power. Hendricks v. Carter, 21 Ga. App. 527, 94 S.E. 807 (1918) (decided under former Civil Code 1910).

Ordinary (now county governing authority) cannot issue bonds to pay for work under contract. - Ordinary (now county governing authority) has power to make all contracts necessary to perform the duties cast upon the ordinary; but the ordinary cannot issue bonds to raise pay for the work done thereunder, this must be done by taxation. Dent v. Cook, 45 Ga. 323 (1872) (decided under former law).

Sheriff has no authority over commissions generated by use of county jail. - County sheriff was not entitled to keep commissions received from a company that provided telephone services to county jail inmates as revenue generated using county property or facilities - such as the jail - was itself county property and therefore subject to county authority under O.C.G.A. § 36-5-22.1. Although a sheriff could collect certain fees, such as fees for attending court, O.C.G.A. § 15-16-21 provided that such fees had to be turned over to the county's treasurer or fiscal officer. Lawson v. Lincoln County, 292 Ga. App. 527, 664 S.E.2d 900 (No. S08C1929, 2008), cert. denied, 2008 Ga. LEXIS 899 (Ga. 2008).

Authority to enact ordinance. - Miller County, Ga., Ordinance No. 10-01, § 3 does not purport to supplant O.C.G.A. § 16-10-6 because the effect of § 3 is to strengthen § 16-10-6 by a broader prohibition with additional specific requirements for any exception; the county had authority, as an incident of the county's home rule power, to enact Miller County, Ga., Ordinance No. 10-01, § 3 so long as the ordinance did not conflict with general law. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Callan, 290 Ga. 327, 720 S.E.2d 608 (2012).

Power to lease. - Ordinary (now county governing authority) had power to lease directly to an individual certain realty for use in operating a filling station, as it was then being and had been used for 13 years. Such a lease, having been so executed was not void on the ground that the lease was not authorized by law, or that the interest thereby created extended beyond the term of the official then in office, or that it amounted to a commercial transaction in which the county was not authorized by law to engage. Black v. Forsyth County, 193 Ga. 571, 19 S.E.2d 297 (1942) (decided under former law).

Employment of counsel. - County governing authority has the implicit power to employ counsel for county officers. Stephenson v. Board of Comm'rs, 261 Ga. 399, 405 S.E.2d 488 (1991).

County governing authority's employment of counsel to represent a superior court clerk did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. 9, Sec. 2, Paras. 1(c)(1) or (7), which preclude the authority from exercising any power in a manner affecting "any elective county office" or "any court or the personnel thereof." Stephenson v. Board of Comm'rs, 261 Ga. 399, 405 S.E.2d 488 (1991).

Cited in Holder v. Hall, 512 U.S. 874, 114 S. Ct. 2581, 129 L. Ed. 2d 687 (1994); Bodker v. Taylor, (N.D. Ga. June 5, 2002); Hill v. Clayton County Bd. of Comm'rs, 283 Ga. App. 15, 640 S.E.2d 638 (2006), overruled on other grounds, Mayor & Aldermen of Savannah v. Batson-Cook Co., 291 Ga. 114, 728 S.E.2d 189 (Ga. 2012). Pelphrey v. Cobb County, 547 F.3d 1263 (11th Cir. 2008).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County commissioners may grant to private corporation a permit to construct sewer across a street dedicated to the county. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-36.

County commissioners have the authority to make a refund to the taxpayer so as to correct the error made to the extent of the interest of the county herein; however, should the county commissioners decline to make a refund in this case, the commissioners could successfully defend any effort to force the commissioners to do so under former Code 1933, § 20-1007 (see now O.C.G.A. § 13-1-13). 1957 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 43.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 20 Am. Jur. 2d, Courts, § 15.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 22, 23.

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 339 et seq.

ALR. - Right of one detained pursuant to quarantine to habeas corpus, 2 A.L.R. 1542.

Right and duty of highway contractor as to barricading or obstructing street, 7 A.L.R. 1203; 104 A.L.R. 955.

36-5-23. Salary of county commissioner in counties having population of not less than 56,400 or more than 60,000.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1038, § 1, effective July 1, 2002.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Code 1981, § 36-5-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 533, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.

36-5-24. Definitions; compensation of members of county governing authorities.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "County governing authority" means a governing authority as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 1-3-3 and an elected county chief executive officer.

(2) "Expenses in the nature of compensation" means any expense allowance or any form of payment or reimbursement of expenses other than reimbursement for expenses actually and necessarily incurred by members of a county governing authority.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by local law, the governing authority of each county is authorized to fix the salary, compensation, expenses, and expenses in the nature of compensation of the members of the governing authority subject to the following conditions:

(1) Any increase in salary, compensation, expenses, or expenses in the nature of compensation for members of a county governing authority shall not be effective until the first day of January of the year following the next general election held after the date on which the action to increase the compensation was taken;

(2) A county governing authority shall take no action to increase salary, compensation, expenses, or expenses in the nature of compensation until notice of intent to take such action and the fiscal impact of such action has been published in a newspaper designated as the legal organ of the county at least once a week for three consecutive weeks immediately preceding the meeting at which the action is taken; and

(3) Such action shall not be taken during the period of time beginning with the date that candidates for election as members of the county governing authority may first qualify as such candidates and ending with the first day of January following the date of qualification.

(c) Salary, compensation, expenses, and expenses in the nature of compensation paid to members of a county governing authority in accordance with applicable local or general salary laws in effect on January 1, 2001, and as subsequently amended, shall continue in full force and effect as compensation for such county officials unless such compensation is increased pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section; and this Code section shall not affect the power of the General Assembly at any time by local or general law to increase or decrease any or all of such compensation or by local law to withdraw the authority otherwise granted to a county governing authority under this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-24, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 789, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 36/HB 79.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-5-24 was repealed and reserved by Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2, effective July 1, 1994. This former Code section, relating to salary of county commissioner in counties having a population of not less than 12,300 or more than 12,400, was based on Code 1981, § 36-5-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 588, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, § 36-5-24, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Citizen challenging legality of salary increase ordinances. - County citizen lacked standing to seek a declaratory judgment with respect to the claims challenging the legality of the salary ordinance as the citizen did not seek to enforce a public duty conferred by statute but rather sought to block the enforcement of an ordinance passed pursuant to O.C.G.A. Ý 36-5-24; thus, O.C.G.A. Ý 9-6-24 did not confer a citizen standing to challenge the validity of acts authorized by the statute or to attack the constitutionality of the statute. Williams v. DeKalb County, Ga. , 840 S.E.2d 423 (2020).

Suit challenging ordinances increasing pay. - Plaintiff, as an individual, had standing to request that a civil penalty be imposed against the commissioners under the Open Meetings Act, O.C.G.A. Ý 50-14-1 et seq., in a suit challenging the county governing authorities increasing their pay via ordinances because the provision plainly contemplated that a private person (or firm, corporation, or other entity) can bring an action to enforce the Act to protect the public from closed-door politics. Williams v. DeKalb County, Ga. , 840 S.E.2d 423 (2020).

36-5-25. Salary of county commissioner in county administered by single commissioner.

Statute text

(a) In every county of this state in which the county government is administered by a single county commissioner, such county commissioner shall be entitled to receive a minimum annual salary equal in amount to the minimum annual salary provided for the sheriff of any such county pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-16-20; provided, however, that a local law may provide for a greater annual salary than such minimum salary or may provide an expense allowance in addition to such minimum salary or in addition to such greater salary; provided, further, that any such county commissioner may by resolution elect to receive a salary of lesser amount which is provided by a local law.

(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not affect any automobile allowance provided for any such county commissioner pursuant to local law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-25, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1038, § 2.)

36-5-26. Authorization for service of process.

Statute text

A county governing authority shall have the power to authorize any of the officers, agents, and employees of the county to serve, in any manner prescribed by applicable law, any process, summons, notice, or order on all persons, as defined in Code Section 1-3-3 therein named, when:

(1) The paper to be served arises out of or relates to an activity or condition conducted or maintained by such person within the territorial jurisdiction of the county in violation of an applicable law or ordinance covering the following: public housing, building, electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, air and water pollution control, solid waste management, and other technical or environmental codes; county business, occupation, and professional license tax ordinances; county privilege license or permit ordinances; or ordinances providing for the protection of facilities for the treatment or wholesale or retail distribution of water from tampering or theft which may arise either from a single isolated act or omission or from an activity or condition;

(2) The paper to be served originates in or is issued under the authority of the department or branch of county government employing such officer, agent, or employee; and

(3) Each and every day the condition is maintained or the activity is conducted is made a separate county offense by applicable law or ordinance.

Where any such paper names one or more persons who reside outside the territorial jurisdiction of the county, the several sheriffs, marshals, and constables of the several counties of this state are authorized and directed to serve any such paper and make appropriate return of such service by them, as other process is served and returned, on such named persons residing in their respective jurisdictions, upon receipt of a written request to make such service, for the fees allowed for service of process issued by the superior courts of this state.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-26, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2122, § 1.)

36-5-27. Compensation supplement with designation as a certified county commissioner.

Statute text

In addition to any other compensation to which a member of a county governing authority is entitled under general or local law, any such official who has been awarded a certificate from the University of Georgia, evidencing his or her successful completion of the voluntary course of training administered by the Carl Vinson Institute of Government resulting in designation as a certified county commissioner shall be entitled to a compensation supplement of $100.00 per month. With regard to members of the governing authority of a consolidated government, designation either as a certified county commissioner or a certified municipal official by the Carl Vinson Institute of Government shall be acceptable.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-27, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 18.)

36-5-28. Members of county governing authority to receive compensation increase when classified service employees receive increase; calculation; effective date.

Statute text

Whenever the state employees subject to compensation plans authorized and approved in accordance with Code Section 45-20-4 receive a cost-of-living increase or general performance based increase of a certain percentage or a certain amount, the compensation to which a member of a governing authority is entitled under general or local law shall be increased by the same percentage or same amount applicable to such state employees. If the cost-of-living increase or general performance based increase received by state employees is in different percentages or different amounts as to certain categories of employees, the amount to which a member of a county governing authority is entitled under general or local law shall be increased by a percentage or an amount not to exceed the average percentage or average amount of the general increase in salary granted to the state employees. The Office of Planning and Budget shall calculate the average percentage increase or average amount increase when necessary. The periodic changes in the amount to which a member of a county governing authority is entitled under general or local law shall become effective on the first day of January following the date that the cost-of-living increases or general performance based increases received by state employees become effective; provided, however, that if the cost-of-living increases received by state employees become effective on January 1, such periodic changes in the amount to which a member of a county governing authority is entitled under general or local law shall become effective on the same date that the cost-of-living increases or general performance based increases received by state employees become effective.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-28, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-55/HB 642.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Salaries and fees of public officers and employees, T. 45, C. 7.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act." This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90."

36-5-29. Pay increases for certain members of county governing authorities.

Statute text

(a) Compensation to which a member of a county governing authority is entitled under general or local law, including amounts provided for in Code Sections 36-5-27 and 36-5-28 shall be increased by multiplying said amounts by the percentage which equals 2.5 percent times the number of completed, four-year terms of office served by such member of a county governing authority where such terms have been completed after December 31, 2004, effective the first day of January following the completion of each such period of service.

(b) For a member of a county governing authority elected to two-year terms of office or six-year terms of office, the percentage increase provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be 1.25 percent times the number of completed two-year terms or 3.75 percent times the number of completed six-year terms as applicable.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-5-29, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 568, § 11/SB 450.)

——————————

CHAPTER 6

COUNTY TREASURER

Sec.

36-6-1. Qualifications for office; election; commission; term; abolishment and fixing compensation of office by General Assembly.

36-6-2. Requirement of bond and oath.

36-6-3. Form of oath.

36-6-4. When bond to be given; form and amount.

36-6-5. Filing and recordation of oath and bond.

36-6-6. Recordation of bond to bind third parties; effect of recordation after 30 days.

36-6-7. Effect of Code Sections 36-6-5 and 36-6-6 on lien of bond.

36-6-8. Time at which lien of bond arises.

36-6-9. Governor's directions relating to bond; payment of costs of transmitting and recording bond.

36-6-10. Location of office.

36-6-11. Books and stationery furnished by county.

36-6-12. Compensation and fees.

36-6-13. Receipt of commission or fees in connection with certain road contracts; collection and disbursement of road contract funds.

36-6-14. Duties generally.

36-6-15. Collection and disbursal of funds generally.

36-6-16. Deposits of county funds in designated depositories.

36-6-16.1. Deposit of funds held for benefit of third persons by officer of county or court in treasury of counties having population of 600,000 or more.

36-6-17. Furnishing of bonds by depositories selected by treasurer.

36-6-18. Arrangements for payment of interest on deposits; disposition of interest payments.

36-6-19. Disposition of books of treasurer when full.

36-6-20. Delivery of money, books, papers, and property to successor.

36-6-21. Final settlement of accounts.

36-6-22. Requirement of accountings by treasurer.

36-6-23. Proceedings upon failure of treasurer to render accounting.

36-6-24. Removal of treasurer.

36-6-25. Filling of vacancies.

36-6-26. Bonds of persons appointed to fill vacancies.

36-6-27. Execution against county treasurer for failure to pay over money.

36-6-28. Purchase of county orders at less than full value or refusal to pay order.

Annotations

Cross references. - Accounting for public funds generally, T. 45, C. 8.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

It would not be proper for anyone to assume duties of treasurer nor would it be proper for the treasurer to attempt to delegate the treasurer's responsibilities and duties to some other officer or other person. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-94.

36-6-1. Qualifications for office; election; commission; term; abolishment and fixing compensation of office by General Assembly.

Statute text

(a) No other conditions of eligibility are required for the office of county treasurer than those which apply to all other county officers, provided that no other county officer can also be county treasurer.

(b) County treasurers shall be elected and commissioned in the same manner and at the same time as clerks of the superior courts and shall hold their offices for terms of four years. The General Assembly, by local law, may abolish the office of county treasurer in any county and may fix the compensation of the county treasurer.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 520; Code 1868, § 584; Code 1873, § 546; Code 1882, § 546; Civil Code 1895, § 452; Civil Code 1910, § 568; Code 1933, § 23-1002; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1212, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Eligibility for county office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III.

Eligibility for public office generally, T. 45, C. 2.

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Nash v. Pierce, 238 Ga. App. 466, 519 S.E.2d 462 (1999).

36-6-2. Requirement of bond and oath.

Statute text

No appointment or election to the office of county treasurer is effective until bond and security is given and the oath of office is taken.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 517; Code 1868, § 581; Code 1873, § 543; Code 1882, § 543; Civil Code 1895, § 449; Civil Code 1910, § 565; Code 1933, § 23-1003.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

When duties of office begin. - Since the treasurer reelected for the new term beginning January 1, did not qualify by giving the bond and security and taking the oath of office until March 13, the treasurer necessarily did not begin to perform the duties of that office under the law for the new term until March 13. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Effect of recital in bond contradicting beginning of duties of office. - Although the bond given as security recited that the bond was to cover the term of four years beginning January 1, such recital merely describes the term for which the treasurer was elected. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Treasurer holds office until successor qualified. - County treasurer qualified and holding office for the term beginning January 1, continued to hold office four years later until the treasurer's successor, although the same individual, had qualified. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 123 et seq.

36-6-3. Form of oath.

Statute text

In addition to the oath required of all public officers, before entering on the duties of their office, county treasurers must take the following oath:

"I, ________, do swear that I will faithfully collect, disburse, and account for all moneys or other effects of the county, and otherwise faithfully discharge all the duties required of me by law as county treasurer. So help me God."

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 522; Code 1868, § 586; Code 1873, § 548; Code 1882, § 548; Civil Code 1895, § 454; Civil Code 1910, § 570; Code 1933, § 23-1004; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Oaths required of public officers generally, T. 45, C. 3.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 124.

C.J.S. - 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 70, 71, 72.

36-6-4. When bond to be given; form and amount.

Statute text

Within 30 days after his election or appointment, the county treasurer shall give a bond payable to the county governing authority with securities approved by such authority, in a sum which in its judgment will be ample to protect the county from any loss.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 523; Code 1868, § 587; Code 1873, § 549; Code 1882, § 549; Ga. L. 1889, p. 51, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 455; Civil Code 1910, § 571; Ga. L. 1918, p. 109, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-1005.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Effect of approval of insufficient bond. - Approval of a bond of a county treasurer for a penalty much less than that required by this section does not relieve the county treasurer of the necessity of giving a bond in the amount of the statutory penalty, when cited to do so by the proper officer. Tarver v. Wooten, 147 Ga. 19, 92 S.E. 532 (1917).

Effect of invalid Act purporting to abolish office and fix bond. - Act purporting to abolish the office of treasurer of a county and to fix the amount of the bond of the clerk, which was later held invalid, is no authority for excusing that treasurer from giving a bond in the penal sum prescribed for bonds of county treasurers by this section. Tarver v. Wooten, 147 Ga. 19, 92 S.E. 532 (1917).

Cited in Carter v. Veal, 42 Ga. App. 88, 155 S.E. 64 (1930); Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 130 et seq., 345 et seq., 358, 488, 489.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 160.

36-6-5. Filing and recordation of oath and bond.

Statute text

(a) The oath of office of the county treasurer must be entered on the minutes of the county governing authority and filed in his office. His official bond must be filed and recorded in such office.

(b) When one or more sureties on the bond of the county treasurer own real estate in any county or counties other than the county in which the treasurer holds office, such bond, within 30 days after the execution thereof, shall be recorded in the county or counties wherein the real estate is situated, by the county governing authority, or such bond shall be recorded within 30 days after its execution by the authority in the book of record of bonds of county officers. After the treasurer's bond is accepted and recorded in the county in which the treasurer holds office, the county governing authority of such county shall forward the same to the county governing authority in each county in which any one or more sureties on the bond own any real estate; such county governing authority to whom the bond is sent shall record the same in accordance with this subsection.

History

(Laws 1838, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 215; Code 1863, § 521; Code 1868, § 585; Code 1873, § 547; Code 1882, § 547; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 104, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 453, 974, 975; Civil Code 1910, §§ 569, 1241, 1242; Code 1933, §§ 23-1006, 23-1007, 23-1008.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 134.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 159, 160. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 70 et seq.

36-6-6. Recordation of bond to bind third parties; effect of recordation after 30 days.

Statute text

As against the interests of third parties acting in good faith and without notice who may have acquired a transfer or lien binding the real estate of any surety on the bond of any county treasurer situated in any county other than that in which the treasurer holds office, no such real estate of the surety shall be bound from the date of the bond unless the bond is recorded in the county. When the bond is recorded after 30 days, the real estate of the surety situated in any county other than that in which the treasurer holds office shall be bound only from the date on which the bond is recorded.

History

(Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 104, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 976; Civil Code 1910, § 1243; Code 1933, § 23-1009.)

36-6-7. Effect of Code Sections 36-6-5 and 36-6-6 on lien of bond.

Statute text

Nothing in Code Sections 36-6-5 and 36-6-6 shall be construed to affect the validity or force of the lien of any such bond from the date thereof as between the parties thereto.

History

(Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 104, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 977; Civil Code 1910, § 1244; Code 1933, § 23-1010.)

36-6-8. Time at which lien of bond arises.

Statute text

When any official bond is executed by any county treasurer or any person acting as such, the property of the treasurer or person acting as such, as well as the security or securities on the bond, shall be bound from the time of the execution thereof for the payment of any and all liability arising from the breach of the bond.

History

(Ga. L. 1876, p. 15, § 1; Code 1882, § 549a; Civil Code 1895, § 456; Civil Code 1910, § 572; Code 1933, § 23-1012.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Statement of policy. - This section is an expression of public policy by the lawmaking branch of the state, providing protection to public funds. It takes precedence over the generally recognized public policy in favor of free alienation of private property. Chero-Cola Co. v. May, 169 Ga. 273, 149 S.E. 895 (1929).

Scope of lien. - Execution of an official bond creates a lien upon the property of the principal, and the property of the principal's sureties, for the payment of all liability that arises from breach of the bond. United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Richmond County, 174 Ga. 599, 163 S.E. 482 (1932).

No lien on property held in trust. - When property is held in trust the property is not subject to an execution issued against trustees as principal and surety on a county treasurer's bond, notwithstanding at the time the bond was executed such trustees were the apparent owners of the land. Hurst v. Commissioners of DeKalb County, 110 Ga. 33, 35 S.E. 294 (1900).

Priority of lien. - Conceding that this section creates a lien, the statute does not fix the priority of such a lien. Gormley v. Troup County, 178 Ga. 446, 173 S.E. 672 (1934).

Timing. - When effort is made to arrest execution on property because the property is encumbered by a security deed, but it is not alleged that such deed is anterior in date to the bond of the treasurer, such effort will be unavailing. Roberts v. Dancer, 144 Ga. 341, 87 S.E. 287 (1915).

Rights of sureties. - In view of a recognition by the personal sureties on a bond of the sureties' continued liability to the secured party under the bond, and of the necessary implication of a final judgment rendered, a court did not err in failing to make an express ruling upon the question of whether or not a purported cancellation entered on the original execution based on that bond was void. United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Clarke, 187 Ga. 774, 2 S.E.2d 608 (1939).

Cited in Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932); Traylor v. Gormley, 177 Ga. 135, 169 S.E. 850 (1933).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 135.

C.J.S. - 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 488.

36-6-9. Governor's directions relating to bond; payment of costs of transmitting and recording bond.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the Governor to give written or printed directions to the county governing authority upon the requirements of Code Sections 36-6-5 through 36-6-7, as other instructions and directions are now given in reference to the bonds of county treasurers. The costs of transmitting and recording the bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer.

History

(Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 104, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 978; Civil Code 1910, § 1245; Code 1933, § 23-1011; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

36-6-10. Location of office.

Statute text

The county treasurer must keep his office at the county site or at some place within one mile of the courthouse.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 526; Code 1868, § 590; Code 1873, § 552; Code 1882, § 552; Civil Code 1895, § 459; Civil Code 1910, § 575; Code 1933, § 23-1014.)

36-6-11. Books and stationery furnished by county.

Statute text

All books and stationery required by the county treasurer must be furnished at the expense of the county.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 528; Code 1868, § 592; Code 1873, § 554; Code 1882, § 554; Civil Code 1895, § 461; Civil Code 1910, § 577; Code 1933, § 23-1020.)

36-6-12. Compensation and fees.

Statute text

County treasurers are entitled to receive the following fees:

(1) For receiving and paying out county funds:

(A) Two and one-half percent for receiving all sums up to $10,000.00.

(B) Two and one-half percent for paying out all sums up to $10,000.00.

(C) One and one-fourth percent for receiving the excess of any sum over $10,000.00.

(D) One and one-fourth percent for paying out the excess of any sum over $10,000.00.
